src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ve icir ízas/XxV7V8 icir
SFX Ve icir íza/XxV1V2V3V4 icir
SFX Ve icir ízan/XxV1V2 icir
SFX Ve iclar íclo/XxV3V4 iclar
SFX Ve iclar ícles/XxV7V8 iclar
SFX Ve iclar íclas/XxV7V8 iclar
SFX Ve iclar ícle/XxV1V2V3V4 iclar
SFX Ve iclar íclen/XxV1V2 iclar
SFX Ve iclar íclan/XxV1V2 iclar
SFX Ve ictar ícto/XxV3V4 ictar
SFX Ve ictar íctes/XxV7V8 ictar
SFX Ve ictar íctas/XxV7V8 ictar
SFX Ve ictar ícte/XxV1V2V3V4 ictar
SFX Ve ictar ícten/XxV1V2 ictar
SFX Ve ictar íctan/XxV1V2 ictar
SFX Ve icuar ícuo/XxV3V4 icuar
SFX Ve icuar ícuas/XxV7V8 icuar
SFX Ve icuar ícuan/XxV1V2 icuar
SFX Ve idar ído/XxV3V4 idar
SFX Ve idar ídes/XxV7V8 idar
SFX Ve idar ídas/XxV7V8 idar
SFX Ve idar íde/XxV1V2V3V4 idar
SFX Ve idar íden/XxV1V2 idar
SFX Ve idar ídan/XxV1V2 idar
SFX Ve idiar ídio/XxV3V4 idiar
SFX Ve idiar ídies/XxV7V8 idiar
SFX Ve idiar ídias/XxV7V8 idiar
SFX Ve idiar ídie/XxV1V2V3V4 idiar
SFX Ve idiar ídien/XxV1V2 idiar
SFX Ve idiar ídian/XxV1V2 idiar
SFX Ve idir ído/XxV3V4 idir
SFX Ve idir ídas/XxV7V8 idir
SFX Ve idir ída/XxV1V2V3V4 idir
SFX Ve idir ídan/XxV1V2 idir
SFX Ve idrar ídro/XxV3V4 idrar
SFX Ve idrar ídres/XxV7V8 idrar
SFX Ve idrar ídras/XxV7V8 idrar
SFX Ve idrar ídre/XxV1V2V3V4 idrar
SFX Ve idrar ídren/XxV1V2 idrar
SFX Ve idrar ídran/XxV1V2 idrar
SFX Ve idriar ídrio/XxV3V4 idriar
SFX Ve idriar ídries/XxV7V8 idriar
SFX Ve idriar ídrias/XxV7V8 idriar
SFX Ve idriar ídrie/XxV1V2V3V4 idriar
SFX Ve idriar ídrien/XxV1V2 idriar
SFX Ve idriar ídrian/XxV1V2 idriar
SFX Ve ifar ífo/XxV3V4 ifar
SFX Ve ifar ífes/XxV7V8 ifar
SFX Ve ifar ífas/XxV7V8 ifar
SFX Ve ifar ífe/XxV1V2V3V4 ifar
SFX Ve ifar ífen/XxV1V2 ifar
SFX Ve ifar ífan/XxV1V2 ifar
SFX Ve iflar íflo/XxV3V4 iflar
SFX Ve iflar ífles/XxV7V8 iflar
SFX Ve iflar íflas/XxV7V8 iflar
SFX Ve iflar ífle/XxV1V2V3V4 iflar
SFX Ve iflar íflen/XxV1V2 iflar
SFX Ve iflar íflan/XxV1V2 iflar
SFX Ve ifrar ífro/XxV3V4 ifrar
SFX Ve ifrar ífres/XxV7V8 ifrar
SFX Ve ifrar ífras/XxV7V8 ifrar
SFX Ve ifrar ífre/XxV1V2V3V4 ifrar
SFX Ve ifrar ífren/XxV1V2 ifrar
SFX Ve ifrar ífran/XxV1V2 ifrar
SFX Ve igar ígo/XxV3V4 igar
SFX Ve igar ígues/XxV7V8 igar
SFX Ve igar ígas/XxV7V8 igar
SFX Ve igar ígue/XxV1V2V3V4 igar
SFX Ve igar íguen/XxV1V2 igar
SFX Ve igar ígan/XxV1V2 igar
SFX Ve ignar ígno/XxV3V4 ignar
SFX Ve ignar ígnes/XxV7V8 ignar
SFX Ve ignar ígnas/XxV7V8 ignar
SFX Ve ignar ígne/XxV1V2V3V4 ignar
SFX Ve ignar ígnen/XxV1V2 ignar
SFX Ve ignar ígnan/XxV1V2 ignar
SFX Ve igrar ígro/XxV3V4 igrar
SFX Ve igrar ígres/XxV7V8 igrar
SFX Ve igrar ígras/XxV7V8 igrar
SFX Ve igrar ígre/XxV1V2V3V4 igrar
SFX Ve igrar ígren/XxV1V2 igrar
SFX Ve igrar ígran/XxV1V2 igrar
SFX Ve iguar íguo/XxV3V4 iguar
SFX Ve iguar ígües/XxV7V8 iguar
SFX Ve iguar íguas/XxV7V8 iguar
SFX Ve iguar ígüe/XxV1V2V3V4 iguar
SFX Ve iguar ígüen/XxV1V2 iguar
SFX Ve iguar íguan/XxV1V2 iguar
SFX Ve iguir ígo/XxV3V4 iguir
SFX Ve iguir ígas/XxV7V8 iguir
SFX Ve iguir íga/XxV1V2V3V4 iguir
SFX Ve iguir ígan/XxV1V2 iguir
SFX Ve ilar ílo/XxV3V4 ilar
SFX Ve ilar íles/XxV7V8 ilar
SFX Ve ilar ílas/XxV7V8 ilar
SFX Ve ilar íle/XxV1V2V3V4 ilar
SFX Ve ilar ílen/XxV1V2 ilar
SFX Ve ilar ílan/XxV1V2 ilar
SFX Ve iguer ígo/XxV3V4 iguer
SFX Ve iguer ígas/XxV7V8 iguer
SFX Ve iguer íga/XxV1V2V3V4 iguer
SFX Ve iguer ígan/XxV1V2 iguer
SFX Ve ildar íldo/XxV3V4 ildar
SFX Ve ildar íldes/XxV7V8 ildar
SFX Ve ildar íldas/XxV7V8 ildar
SFX Ve ildar ílde/XxV1V2V3V4 ildar
SFX Ve ildar ílden/XxV1V2 ildar
SFX Ve ildar íldan/XxV1V2 ildar
SFX Ve ildir íldo/XxV3V4 ildir
SFX Ve ildir íldas/XxV7V8 ildir
SFX Ve ildir ílda/XxV1V2V3V4 ildir
SFX Ve ildir íldan/XxV1V2 ildir
SFX Ve ildrar íldro/XxV3V4 ildrar
SFX Ve ildrar íldres/XxV7V8 ildrar
SFX Ve ildrar íldras/XxV7V8 ildrar
SFX Ve ildrar íldre/XxV1V2V3V4 ildrar
SFX Ve ildrar íldren/XxV1V2 ildrar
SFX Ve ildrar íldran/XxV1V2 ildrar
SFX Ve ilfar ílfo/XxV3V4 ilfar
SFX Ve ilfar ílfes/XxV7V8 ilfar
SFX Ve ilfar ílfas/XxV7V8 ilfar
SFX Ve ilfar ílfe/XxV1V2V3V4 ilfar
SFX Ve ilfar ílfen/XxV1V2 ilfar
SFX Ve ilfar ílfan/XxV1V2 ilfar
SFX Ve ilgar ílgo/XxV3V4 ilgar
SFX Ve ilgar ílgues/XxV7V8 ilgar
SFX Ve ilgar ílgas/XxV7V8 ilgar
SFX Ve ilgar ílgue/XxV1V2V3V4 ilgar
SFX Ve ilgar ílguen/XxV1V2 ilgar
SFX Ve ilgar ílgan/XxV1V2 ilgar
SFX Ve iliar ílio/XxV3V4 iliar
SFX Ve iliar ílies/XxV7V8 iliar
SFX Ve iliar ílias/XxV7V8 iliar
SFX Ve iliar ílie/XxV1V2V3V4 iliar
SFX Ve iliar ílien/XxV1V2 iliar
SFX Ve iliar ílian/XxV1V2 iliar
SFX Ve ilir ílo/XxV3V4 ilir
SFX Ve ilir ílas/XxV7V8 ilir
SFX Ve ilir íla/XxV1V2V3V4 ilir
SFX Ve ilir ílan/XxV1V2 ilir
SFX Ve illar íllo/XxV3V4 illar
SFX Ve illar ílles/XxV7V8 illar
SFX Ve illar íllas/XxV7V8 illar
SFX Ve illar ílle/XxV1V2V3V4 illar
SFX Ve illar íllen/XxV1V2 illar
SFX Ve illar íllan/XxV1V2 illar
SFX Ve illir íllo/XxV3V4 illir
SFX Ve illir íllas/XxV7V8 illir
SFX Ve illir ílla/XxV1V2V3V4 illir
SFX Ve illir íllan/XxV1V2 illir
SFX Ve ilmar ílmo/XxV3V4 ilmar
SFX Ve ilmar ílmes/XxV7V8 ilmar
SFX Ve ilmar ílmas/XxV7V8 ilmar
SFX Ve ilmar ílme/XxV1V2V3V4 ilmar
SFX Ve ilmar ílmen/XxV1V2 ilmar
SFX Ve ilmar ílman/XxV1V2 ilmar
SFX Ve iltar ílto/XxV3V4 iltar
SFX Ve iltar íltes/XxV7V8 iltar
SFX Ve iltar íltas/XxV7V8 iltar
SFX Ve iltar ílte/XxV1V2V3V4 iltar
SFX Ve iltar ílten/XxV1V2 iltar
SFX Ve iltar íltan/XxV1V2 iltar
SFX Ve iltriar íltrio/XxV3V4 iltriar
SFX Ve iltriar íltries/XxV7V8 iltriar
SFX Ve iltriar íltrias/XxV7V8 iltriar
SFX Ve iltriar íltrie/XxV1V2V3V4 iltriar
SFX Ve iltriar íltrien/XxV1V2 iltriar
SFX Ve iltriar íltrian/XxV1V2 iltriar
SFX Ve ilvar ílvo/XxV3V4 ilvar
SFX Ve ilvar ílves/XxV7V8 ilvar
SFX Ve ilvar ílvas/XxV7V8 ilvar
SFX Ve ilvar ílve/XxV1V2V3V4 ilvar
SFX Ve ilvar ílven/XxV1V2 ilvar
SFX Ve ilvar ílvan/XxV1V2 ilvar
SFX Ve imar ímo/XxV3V4 imar
SFX Ve imar ímes/XxV7V8 imar
SFX Ve imar ímas/XxV7V8 imar
SFX Ve imar íme/XxV1V2V3V4 imar
SFX Ve imar ímen/XxV1V2 imar
SFX Ve imar íman/XxV1V2 imar
SFX Ve imbir ímbo/XxV3V4 imbir
SFX Ve imbir ímbas/XxV7V8 imbir
SFX Ve imbir ímba/XxV1V2V3V4 imbir
SFX Ve imbir ímban/XxV1V2 imbir
SFX Ve imblar ímblo/XxV3V4 imblar
SFX Ve imblar ímbles/XxV7V8 imblar
SFX Ve imblar ímblas/XxV7V8 imblar
SFX Ve imblar ímble/XxV1V2V3V4 imblar
SFX Ve imblar ímblen/XxV1V2 imblar
SFX Ve imblar ímblan/XxV1V2 imblar
SFX Ve imbliar ímblio/XxV3V4 imbliar
SFX Ve imbliar ímblies/XxV7V8 imbliar
SFX Ve imbliar ímblias/XxV7V8 imbliar
SFX Ve imbliar ímblie/XxV1V2V3V4 imbliar
SFX Ve imbliar ímblien/XxV1V2 imbliar
SFX Ve imbliar ímblian/XxV1V2 imbliar
SFX Ve imblir ímblo/XxV3V4 imblir
SFX Ve imblir ímblas/XxV7V8 imblir
SFX Ve imblir ímbla/XxV1V2V3V4 imblir
SFX Ve imblir ímblan/XxV1V2 imblir
SFX Ve imbrar ímbro/XxV3V4 imbrar
SFX Ve imbrar ímbres/XxV7V8 imbrar
SFX Ve imbrar ímbras/XxV7V8 imbrar
SFX Ve imbrar ímbre/XxV1V2V3V4 imbrar
SFX Ve imbrar ímbren/XxV1V2 imbrar
SFX Ve imbrar ímbran/XxV1V2 imbrar
SFX Ve imbriar ímbrio/XxV3V4 imbriar
SFX Ve imbriar ímbries/XxV7V8 imbriar
SFX Ve imbriar ímbrias/XxV7V8 imbriar
SFX Ve imbriar ímbrie/XxV1V2V3V4 imbriar
SFX Ve imbriar ímbrien/XxV1V2 imbriar
SFX Ve imbriar ímbrian/XxV1V2 imbriar
SFX Ve imiar ímio/XxV3V4 imiar
SFX Ve imiar ímies/XxV7V8 imiar
SFX Ve imiar ímias/XxV7V8 imiar
SFX Ve imiar ímie/XxV1V2V3V4 imiar
SFX Ve imiar ímien/XxV1V2 imiar
SFX Ve imiar ímian/XxV1V2 imiar
SFX Ve imir ímo/XxV3V4 imir
SFX Ve imir ímas/XxV7V8 imir
SFX Ve imir íma/XxV1V2V3V4 imir
SFX Ve imir íman/XxV1V2 imir
SFX Ve impar ímpo/XxV3V4 impar
SFX Ve impar ímpes/XxV7V8 impar
SFX Ve impar ímpas/XxV7V8 impar
SFX Ve impar ímpe/XxV1V2V3V4 impar
SFX Ve impar ímpen/XxV1V2 impar
SFX Ve impar ímpan/XxV1V2 impar
SFX Ve impiar ímpio/XxV3V4 impiar
SFX Ve impiar ímpies/XxV7V8 impiar
SFX Ve impiar ímpias/XxV7V8 impiar
SFX Ve impiar ímpie/XxV1V2V3V4 impiar
SFX Ve impiar ímpien/XxV1V2 impiar
SFX Ve impiar ímpian/XxV1V2 impiar
SFX Ve implar ímplo/XxV3V4 implar
SFX Ve implar ímples/XxV7V8 implar
SFX Ve implar ímplas/XxV7V8 implar
SFX Ve implar ímple/XxV1V2V3V4 implar
SFX Ve implar ímplen/XxV1V2 implar
SFX Ve implar ímplan/XxV1V2 implar
SFX Ve inar íno/XxV3V4 inar
SFX Ve inar ínes/XxV7V8 inar
SFX Ve inar ínas/XxV7V8 inar
SFX Ve inar íne/XxV1V2V3V4 inar
