src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
abatir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ablugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abregonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acachar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acarambelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acegaratar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
achucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acolletar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acoroyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acuarteronar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adelantar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afalampar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aforciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afutar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agolpar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aguciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
albanciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alforxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allupar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amagayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amaruxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amollentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amosquerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
analayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
angüeñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anuedar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apanfilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apavorar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apencar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apicarzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apiñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aponguer/XxVeVh st:aponer
aprensar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aquerindar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ariscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrancar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arreblagar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arreguñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arretalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asalendar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asimilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asperar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atorriyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atusar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
axenciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
añegralar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
baruyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bolichar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cacear/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
campizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
carretiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cerrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chisporrotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
clabuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
compadecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
construir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
corroyer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cuquellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
demediar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desacotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desamostiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desatafañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
descolonizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desempolainar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desenllastrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desganchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
despinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dibuxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
durar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embermeyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empacar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empelleyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empresar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encaniyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encerriscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encorvitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfarrucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engangar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engriñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enllutar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enrollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entardar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entrecachar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
envidiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
equilibrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esberridar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escachizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escandalizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escarranquilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esclucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escostrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escuyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfondir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgargolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esguñipar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmechar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esnarar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espartexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esperniquebrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espolveriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estallar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estolexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estrollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
eszobayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
farriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
floxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
frier/XxVeVh st:frir
garabuyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gorgutar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
hencher/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
indicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
iñir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llustrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mantegar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mecanizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
momificar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
namoricar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ocupar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
palotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pañucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
peñizcar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
podrigañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pretender/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
quexudumar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
raspar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rebuyir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reelixir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rellampiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
repensar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
resistir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
revenguer/XxVeVh st:revenir
robexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
salivar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sicoanalizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sollagar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tabiscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
teclar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tontayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trayer/VtVeVhVjVkVr
trillar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
utilizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
vidrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xerminar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zalaburdiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ñevarruscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
